Hawaii statutes.
§577-16 Curfew; children in public streets,
prohibited when; penalty. Any child under sixteen years of age, who,
except in case of necessity, or except when permitted so to do in writing by a
judge of the family court, goes or remains on any public street, highway,
public place, or private place held open to the public after ten o'clock in the
evening and before four o'clock in the morning, unaccompanied by either a
parent or guardian, or an adult person duly authorized by a parent or guardian
to accompany the child, is subject to adjudication under section 571-11(2). [L
1896, c 29, §1; am L 1907, c 34, §1; am L 1913, c 124, §1; am L 1915, c 44, §1;
RL 1925, §3049; RL 1935, §4530; am L 1943, c 78, pt of §1; RL 1945, §12282; am
L 1949, c 279, §1; RL 1955, §330-14; am imp L 1965, c 232, §1; HRS §577-16; am
L 1975, c 77, §1(5); am L 1980, c 303, §6]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next